District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.12

Reciprocity for emergency medical services personnel certified in other jurisdictions.

(a)

The Mayor may grant provisional certification, at the equivalent classification level, to any individual possessing a current valid emergency medical services personnel credential issued by any state or United States territory.

(b)

The provisional certification issued pursuant to this section shall be effective for a period not to exceed 90 days.

(c)

The Mayor may fully certify the individual as emergency medical services personnel in the District of Columbia, at the appropriate classification level, upon verification from the state or territory originally granting certification that the individual has successfully completed training and competency evaluation equivalent to that required by the Mayor by this chapter and by rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or upon the successful completion by the individual of the District’s competency evaluation at the appropriate classification level.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 13, 56 DCR 1167